Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.235

Commute trip reduction—Higher education institutions—Exemption.

All state higher education institutions are exempt from RCW 43.01.225.

[ 1993 c 394 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1993 c 394: See note following RCW 43.01.220.